New Jersey, session 222, A4447.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, for Fiscal Year 2027, the total amounts appropriated from the State General Fund, Property Tax Relief Fund established pursuant to N.J.S.54A:9-25 the Casino Control Fund established pursuant to section 143 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-143), the Casino Revenue Fund established pursuant to section 145 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-145) and the Gubernatorial Elections Fund established pursuant to N.J.S.54A:9-25.1 shall not exceed the total amounts appropriated from those funds in Fiscal Year 2026. b.    (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, for Fiscal Year 2027, any revenue collected in excess of the total amount collected in Fiscal Year 2026 shall be appropriated in Fiscal Year 2028 for deposit into the New Jersey Debt Defeasance and Prevention Fund, established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2021, c.125 (C.52:9H-2.2). (2)   The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to any source of federal revenue or constitutionally dedicated State revenue. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire on July 1, 2028.